Utah statutes.
10-8-92.   Joint board -- Membership -- Powers.
When two or more political subdivisions of the state of Utah join together
under this act for the purposes set forth herein, there shall be set up by the
political subdivisions so joining, a joint board whose membership shall have
equal representation from each of the political subdivisions joining, and
which said board shall be empowered with the administration, operation,
construction and maintenance of said joint hospital.
